Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.092

Rights under chapter proceedings—Appointment of counsel—Notice.

At the commencement of the shelter care hearing the court shall advise the parties of basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090 and appoint counsel to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian pursuant to RCW 13.34.090 if the parent, guardian, or legal custodian is indigent unless counsel has been retained by the parent, guardian, or legal custodian or the court finds that the right to counsel has been expressly and voluntarily waived in court.

[ 2021 c 210 s 3; 2000 c 122 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 210: See note following RCW 13.34.090.